web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.aff
#********************************************************************************
# feminin
SFX r Y 37
SFX r ica ica ica                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX r ica ea ica                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX r ica ico ica
SFX r ica elei ica                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX r ica ele ica                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ica elele ica                        s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ica elelor ica                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r sca sca sca                    s.f.sg.art
SFX r sca scao sca
SFX r sca stei [^a]sca                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r sca ste [^a]sca                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r sca stele [^a]sca                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r sca stelor [^a]sca                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r asca astei [^e]asca                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r asca aste [^e]asca                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r asca astele [^e]asca                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r asca astelor [^e]asca                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r asca stei easca                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r asca ste easca                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r asca stele easca                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r asca stelor easca                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ata ata ata                s.f.sg.art.
SFX r ata ato ata
SFX r ata tei eata               s.f.sg.dat
SFX r ata te  eata              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ata tele  eata              s.f.pl.art.
SFX r ata telor eata              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ata etei [^e]ata               s.f.sg.dat
SFX r ata ete  [^e]ata              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ata etele  [^e]ata              s.f.pl.art.
SFX r ata etelor  [^e]ata              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ga ga ga          s.f.sg.art
SFX r ga go ga
SFX r ga gii ga         s.f.sg.dat
SFX r ga gi ga          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ga gile ga          s.f.pl.art.
SFX r ga gilor ga          s.f.pl.dat.

SFX R Y 72
SFX R sca sca sca                    s.f.sg.art
SFX R sca scao sca
SFX R sca stii [^a]sca                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R sca sti [^a]sca                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R sca stile [^a]sca                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R sca stilor [^a]sca                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R asca astii [^e]asca                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R asca asti [^e]asca                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R asca astile [^e]asca                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R asca astilor [^e]asca                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R asca stii easca                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R asca sti easca                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R asca stile easca                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R asca stilor easca                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R anca anca anca              s.f.sg.art.
SFX R anca anco anca
SFX R anca ncei [^i]anca             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R anca nce [^i]anca              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R anca ncele [^i]anca            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R anca ncelor [^i]anca            s.f.pl.art.dat.
SFX R anca encei ianca             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R anca ence ianca              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R anca encele ianca            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R anca encelor ianca            s.f.pl.art.dat.
SFX R ana ana [^e]ana              s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ana ano [^e]ana
SFX R ana enei [^e]ana             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ana ene [^e]ana              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ana enele [^e]ana            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ana enelor [^e]ana           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ana ana eana                  s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ana ano eana
SFX R ana nei eana                   s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ana ne eana                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ana nele eana                  s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ana nelor eana                 s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R aza aza aza                     s.f.sg.art
SFX R aza azo aza
SFX R aza ezei aza                    s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R aza eze aza                     s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R aza ezele aza                   s.f.pl.art.
SFX R aza ezelor aza                  s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R asca  asca asca               s.f.sg.art.
SFX R asca  asco asca
SFX R asca  esti asca                 s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R asca  estii asca                s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R asca  estile asca              s.f.pl.art.
SFX R asca  estilor asca             s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R aie aia aie                       s.f.sg.art.
SFX R aie aio aie
SFX R aie aii aie                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R aie ai aie                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R aie aile aie                       s.f.pl.art.
SFX R aie ailor aie                      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ica ica ica                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ica ico ica
SFX R ica icii ica                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ica ici ica                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ica icile ica                        s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ica icilor ica                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ara ara ara                         s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ara aro ara
SFX R ara erei ara                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ara ere ara                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ara erele ara                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ara erelor ara                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R a a [^rnzci]a                         s.f.sg.art.
SFX R a o [^rnzci]a
SFX R a e [^rnzci]a                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R a ei [^rnzci]a                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R a ele [^rnzci]a                      s.f.pl.art.
SFX R a elor [^rnzc]a                      s.f.pl.dat.


SFX s Y 6
SFX s ica ica ica                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX s ica ico ica
SFX s ica icei ica                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX s ica ice ica                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX s ica icele ica                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX s ica icelor ica                       s.f.pl.dat.

SFX u Y 6
SFX u ica ica ica                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX u ica ico ica
SFX u ica elei ica                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX u ica ele ica                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX u ica elele ica                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX u ica elelor ica                       s.f.pl.dat.



#defect de singular
SFX a Y 2
SFX a   e     ele   e                  s.f.pl.art.
SFX a   e     elor  e                  s.f.pl.dat.
