web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
acadiana/R
adormitele/a
agareanca/R
aglica/s
albaiulianca/R
albastrica/r
algeriana/R
almageste/a
alunica/r
amigdaliana/R
analecte/a
antiaeriana/R
antitiroidiana/R
aplica/s
arendasoaica/s
argentiniana/R
argintica/r
aricioaica/s
aristoteliana/R
armonica/R
araboaica/s
arapoaica/s
arsica/s
asirianca/R
australiana/R
autoverificare/a
babiloniana/R
balalaica/R
barabusca/r
basarabeana/R
bavetica/r
beletristica/R
bergsoniana/R
bibica/R
bicotidiana/R
bioenergeticiana/R
bistriteanca/R
bodega/r
boieroaica/s
boliviana/R
bonetica/r
bongoase/a
borticica/u
bouroaica/s
brasoveanca/R
brosurica/R
branzoaica/s
bucuresteanca/R
bucatica/r
bulgaroaica/s
bunicica/r
buroaica/s
burticica/r
butica/R
barladeanca/R
bacuiata/r
bagareata/r
balticica/r
balusca/r
bandurica/R
basica/R
cafegioaica/s
calende/a
cambodgiana/R
capuchehaie/R
caransebeseanca/R
carlinga/r
carpiana/R
catalige/a
catoniana/R
catrafuse/a
cefalorahidiana/R
cega/r
cerboaica/s
cernavodeanca/R
certareata/r
cezariana/R
chiaburoaica/s
chichineata/r
chilipirgioaica/s
chimicale/a
chinezoaica/s
chinga/r
chisca/r
chisinauianca/R
ciobotica/r
ciocoaica/s
cioroaica/s
ciovica/R
ciubotica/r
ciumafaie/R
cliniciana/R
clujeanca/R
cocosneata/r
codosca/r
codanica/r
cojoaica/s
colegiana/R
confete/a
constanteanca/R
coreica/R
corobeata/r
cosanzeana/R
cotiga/r
covatica/r
craniana/R
creata/r
cucuvaie/R
cumnatica/r
curticica/r
campeanca/R
camasuica/R
capsunica/r
carnicica/r
carticica/r
dalmatica/R
danubiana/R
demotica/s
desaga/r
dialectica/R
dinamica/R
doljeanca/R
dorneanca/R
drisca/r
drosca/r
drughineata/r
druga/r
dracoaica/s
dragaica/s
draganele/a
dumbraveanca/R
dandanaie/R
egiptiana/R
electroniciana/R
elinica/r
eminesciana/R
enciclica/s
enesciana/R
englezoaica/s
epicuriana/R
estoniana/R
etnobotanica/R
eumenide/a
evreiasca/R
evreica/s
fabiana/R
faustiana/R
fata/r
feciorica/r
ferega/r
ferestrica/R
feriga/r
fesfesele/a
ficomicete/a
fiica/s
filimica/R
filipica/s
firicica/r
fisca/R
flocosica/r
floricica/r
flamanzica/r
foicica/r
foneticiana/R
fortareata/r
frantuzoaica/s
frantusca/r
frica/R
frigurica/r
frumusica/r
frunzica/R
fuegiana/R
funga/r
faneata/r
fasneata/r
faramica/R
gaibarace/a
gaibe/a
galitiana/R
geambarale/a
geamparale/a
geneticiana/R
georgiana/R
ghilimele/a
ghilimete/a
giurgiuveanca/R
glamnica/s
gluga/r
gogoneata/r
golicica/r
gramaticiana/R
grecoaica/s
gustarica/R
hangioaica/s
harghiteanca/R
hatorica/s
hertziana/R
hidroenergeticiana/R
hipertiroidiana/R
hoasca/r
horbotica/r
hotoaica/s
hrisca/R
huseanca/R
huste/a
haitusca/r
halaciuga/r
ialomiteanca/R
iele/a
iepuroaica/s
ilfoveanca/R
ineata/r
inframicrobiana/R
interfata/r
ioniana/R
iperige/a
israeliana/R
istericale/a
iubitica/u
ivoriana/R
jachetica/r
jiana/R
jucarica/r
kampuchiana/R
kuwaitiana/R
lancasteriana/R
late/a
legaturica/R
legaturica/r
leoaica/s
lesbiana/R
levantica/r
liberiana/R
liga/r
limbistica/R
lipoveanca/R
logiciana/R
lopatica/r
lorica/s
lovele/a
lumanarica/r
luntricica/r
lupoaica/s
lusitaniana/R
lacaraie/R
macromicete/a
magiciana/R
mahalagioaica/s
maioresciana/R
mamitica/R
manisca/r
mastica/R
mauritiana/R
melituica/R
mendre/a
merindeata/r
merovingiana/R
metacarpiana/R
metateriana/R
mezomorfica/s
miceniana/R
micromicete/a
mica/R
micsunica/r
mierlusca/r
militiana/R
minciunica/r
mitrica/s
mixomicete/a
moftangioaica/s
mogaldeata/r
moldoveanca/R
momaiata/r
morga/r
moroaica/s
morosana/R
motoasca/r
mreana/R
muierusca/r
mustareata/r
muziciana/R
mancarica/u
magurica/r
magareata/r
maiculeana/R
maliga/r
mamaliga/r
margica/r
margineanca/R
margarele/a
maricica/r
maruntaie/a
maturica/r
matusica/r
nagaica/s
napoleoniana/R
neglasnica/s
negrilica/R
negroaica/s
negrusca/r
nemtoaica/s
neomalthusiana/R
nepotica/u
nevestica/R
nigeriana/R
nopticica/r
novatiana/R
nuielusca/r
nataroaica/s
oarecica/r
oboreana/R
ocniteanca/R
oftiga/r
oitica/R
olicica/r
omatute/a
opticiana/R
orga/r
orheianca/R
orastica/R
ovreica/s
palavragioaica/s
pandecte/a
pana/R
patasca/r
patriciana/R
patrontasca/r
pepenoaica/s
percica/r
persiana/R
piata/r
picaturica/r
pielcica/r
pielicica/r
pielusica/r
pietricica/r
pingica/r
piroga/r
pirotehnica/R
pitoasca/r
pitigoaica/s
plasmodesme/a
plasca/R
ploicica/r
plumanarica/r
placintica/r
plamanarica/r
plapumica/r
platica/R
podeata/r
polemica/R
polusca/r
pomanagioaica/s
poponeata/r
portretistica/R
porumboaica/s
postfata/r
povata/r
precambriana/R
precupeata/r
prefata/r
preparative/a
proasca/r
problematica/R
propilee/a
pradalica/s
prajiturica/r
pubiana/R
pufoaica/s
pungasoaica/s
punticica/u
puricica/u
puschineata/r
puskiniana/R
pustoaica/s
parga/r
papica/R
papusica/r
particica/r
paranga/r
patlagica/r
patratica/r
paturica/r
rahidiana/R
rechizite/a
rezineanca/R
roticica/r
rourica/u
rusoaica/s
ruteanca/R
rachitica/r
radasca/r
ramrica/r
ramurica/r
rapciuga/r
razbunica/R
ratusca/r
scandalagioaica/s
scotiana/R
scrisorica/r
scaricica/r
secerica/r
seceratica/r
sforicica/u
siberiana/R
singurica/r
sinopticiana/R
slobozeanca/R
sluga/r
spanioloaica/s
spitalagioaica/s
statisticiana/R
strigoaica/s
strunga/r
strungareata/r
straghiata/r
sturzoaica/s
subtirica/r
sulitica/r
sultanica/u
suprafortareata/r
suratica/r
suveica/R
sagetica/r
salatica/r
saneata/r
sarmanica/r
sasoaica/s
sateana/R
tarapangele/a
tbilisiana/R
teleloaica/s
telemecanica/R
tenesme/a
terme/a
termoenergeticiana/R
tigroaica/s
tilinga/r
tinichigioaica/s
tiroidiana/R
tivga/r
toga/r
toharica/s
tovarasica/u
transcaucaziana/R
tratative/a
trifoliene/a
trisfetite/a
troiana/R
tranjoaica/s
turaniana/R
turcoaica/s
turticica/r
tutungioaica/s
talharoaica/s
tartaroaica/s
tatarnica/s
tataroaica/s
ucraineanca/R
udaturica/r
ulcica/r
unguroaica/s
ursoaica/s
uratica/r
uscatica/r
usurica/r
vaga/r
vegetariana/R
verga/r
vesca/R
vinetica/r
vitica/r
vulpoaica/s
vulturoaica/s
valceana/R
valcica/r
vantoaica/s
vaiuga/r
westfaliana/R
zarzavagioaica/s
zavragioaica/s
zgripsoroaica/s
zgriptoroaica/s
zgripturoaica/s
zgrabuntica/r
zimbre/a
zmeoaica/s
zootehniciana/R
zumaricale/a
zarzarica/r
insemnarica/r
serpoaica/s
soproneata/r
soricioaica/s
svaboaica/s
taica/R
tutuianca/R
tandarica/u
